Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 53.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
or

“State Board”

means the State Board of Local and Regional Jails.

“Community correctional facility”
means any group home, halfway house or other physically unrestricting facility used for the housing, treatment or care of adult offenders established or operated with funds appropriated to the Department of Corrections from the state treasury and maintained or operated by any political subdivision, combination of political subdivisions or privately operated agency within the Commonwealth.

“Community supervision”
means probation, parole, postrelease supervision, programs authorized under the Comprehensive Community Corrections Act for local responsible offenders, and programs authorized under Article 7 (§

53.1-128

et seq.) of Chapter 3.

“Correctional officer”
means a duly sworn employee of the Department of Corrections whose normal duties relate to maintaining immediate control, supervision and custody of prisoners confined in any state correctional facility.

“Department”
means the Department of Corrections.

“Deputy sheriff”
means a duly sworn officer appointed by a sheriff pursuant to §

15.2-1603

whose normal duties include, but are not limited to, maintaining immediate control, supervision and custody of prisoners confined in any local correctional facility and may include those duties of a jail officer.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Corrections.

“Jail officer”
means a duly sworn employee of a local correctional facility, except for deputy sheriffs, whose normal duties relate to maintaining immediate control, supervision and custody of prisoners confined in any local correctional facility. This definition in no way limits any authority otherwise granted to a duly sworn deputy sheriff whose duties may include those of a jail officer.

“Local correctional facility”
means any jail, jail farm or other place used for the detention or incarceration of adult offenders, excluding a lock-up, which is owned, maintained, or operated by any political subdivision or combination of political subdivisions of the Commonwealth. For the purposes of subsection B of §

53.1-68

and §§

53.1-69

,

53.1-69.1

, and

53.1-127

, “local correctional facility” also includes any facility owned, maintained, or operated by any political subdivision or combination of political subdivisions of the Commonwealth that is used for the detention or incarceration of people pursuant to a contract or third-party contract with the federal government or any agency or contractor thereof.

“Lock-up”
means a facility whose primary use is to detain persons for a short period of time as determined by the Board.

“State correctional facility”
means any correctional center or correctional field unit used for the incarceration of adult offenders established and operated by the Department of Corrections, or operated under contract pursuant to §

53.1-262

. This term shall include “penitentiary” whenever used in this title or other titles of the Code.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-9, 53-19.5, 53-19.18, 53-19.18:1, 53-19.23; 1966, c. 300; 1970, c. 648; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1976, cc. 740, 756; 1977, c. 187; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 477; 1991, c. 383; 1995, c. 224; 1999, c. 845; 2000, c. 807; 2020, c. 759; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 23.

Cross references.

As to the purchase of products and services from state correctional facilities, see §

2.2-1116

.

As to the powers and duties of the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Criminal Justice Services Board, see §

9.1-102

.

As to the Line of Duty Act, see §

9.1-400

et seq.

As to disarming a law-enforcement or correctional officer and penalty involved, see §

18.2-57.02

.

As to penalty for bribery by jail officers in correctional facilities, see §

18.2-474.2

Editor’s note.

At its regular session of 1980, the General Assembly directed the Code Commission to make a study of Title 53 and report its findings to the Governor and General Assembly in the form of a recodification of that title. In January of 1982, the Commission sent to the Governor and General Assembly its report containing a proposed revision of Title 53. This report, which was published as Senate Document No. 19 of the 1982 Session, contains reviser’s notes and other explanatory matter which, while valuable, are too lengthy for inclusion here. The Commission’s draft of the revision of Title 53, as amended by the General Assembly, became c. 636 of the Acts of 1982. It repeals Title 53 of the Code and enacts in lieu thereof a new Title 53.1.

In addition to its revision by c. 636, former Title 53 was amended by certain other acts passed at the 1982 Session. As required by § 30-152 and Acts 1982, c. 636, cl. 7, these amendments have been incorporated into new Title 53.1.

Some of the cases cited in the notes under the various sections of this title were decided under corresponding provisions of former Title 53 and earlier statutes.

Acts 1982, c. 636, clauses 2, 3, 4, and 7, provide as follows:

“2. That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section, article or chapter of Title 53 or any other title of this Code as such titles existed prior to July 1, 1982, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section, article or chapter of this title or any other title of this Code and whenever any such former section, article or chapter is given a new number in this or any other title, all references to any such former section, article or chapter of Title 53 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section, article or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents or portions thereof.

“3. That the rules and regulations of the State Board of Corrections and the Virginia Parole Board in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations promulgated under this act.

“4. That this recodification of Title 53 as Title 53.1 shall not be construed to require the reappointment of any officer or any member of a board, council, committee or other appointed body referred to in Title 53.1, and each such officer and member shall continue to serve the term for which appointed pursuant to the provisions of Title 53.

“7. That this act shall be deemed to have been enacted prior to any other act enacted in the 1982 regular session of the General Assembly, and any act purporting to amend and reenact any law contained in Title 53 or Title 53.1 of the Code of Virginia is deemed to be added to, amendatory of, or a repealer of, as the case may be, any corresponding law contained in this act; provided, that effect shall be given to such other or subsequent act only to the extent of any apparent changes in the law as it existed prior to the commencement of such session.”

Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 2, effective April 6, 1995, provides: “That in keeping with the purposes of this act and to induce eligible state employees to voluntarily resign from employment with the Commonwealth, any full-time employee of the Commonwealth (i) whose position is covered by the Virginia Personnel Act (§ 2.1-110 et seq. [see now §

2.2-2900

et seq.] of the Code of Virginia), (ii) whose position is exempt from the Virginia Personnel Act pursuant to subdivision A 2, A 4 (except those persons specified in subsection C of § 2.1-116.22 [see now §

2.2-3202

] of the Code of Virginia), A 7, A 15 or A 16 of § 2.1-116 of the Code of Virginia (iii) who is employed by the State Corporation Commission, (iv) who is employed by the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission, (v) who is employed by the Virginia Retirement System, (vi) who is employed by the State Lottery Department, (vii) who is employed by the Medical College of Virginia Hospitals or the University of Virginia Medical Center, or (viii) who is employed at a state educational institution as administrative or professional faculty (but excluding presidents and teaching and research faculty) as defined in the Consolidated Salary Authorization for Faculty Positions in Institutions of Higher Education, 1994-95, may, subject to the conditions set forth in the fifth enactment of this act, elect to voluntarily resign and receive a severance benefit equivalent to (i) four weeks of salary if the employee has two years or less of consecutive service or (ii) two weeks of salary for each year of consecutive service, not to exceed thirty-six weeks of salary, if the employee has more than two years of consecutive service, together with the benefits conferred by subsection D of § 2.1-116.23 [see now §

2.2-3203

] of the Code of Virginia. Such employee shall also receive, in lieu of any unemployment compensation benefits to which the employee may be entitled, an amount, payable to the employee by the terminating agency on the employee’s date of termination, equal to the present value of the maximum unemployment compensation the employee would have received pursuant to Title 60.2 of the Code of Virginia had he been eligible for such benefits by virtue of the termination of his employment, not to exceed $5,000. The additional terms and conditions specified in § 2.1-116.23 [see now §

2.2-3203

] shall apply to those eligible state employees making such election and to the transitional severance benefit payable hereunder. Written application of an eligible employee’s election to participate in this incentive program shall be made to his employing agency no later than March 31, 1995. An eligible employee’s resignation pursuant to the program established by this enactment shall be effective May 1, 1995, unless an alternative date is authorized by the governing authority, as defined in the fifth enactment of this act, but in no event later than July 1, 1996.”

Acts 1995, c. 152, cl. 3, effective March 10, 1995, and Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 3, effective April 6, 1995, provide: “That in lieu of receiving a transitional severance benefit under the second enactment of this act, but in keeping with the purposes of this act and to induce eligible state employees to voluntarily retire from employment with the Commonwealth, any full-time employee of the Commonwealth (i) whose position is covered by the Virginia Personnel Act (§ 2.1-110 et seq. [see now §

2.2-2900

et seq.] of the Code of Virginia), (ii) whose position is exempt from the Virginia Personnel Act pursuant to subdivision A 2, A 4 (except those persons specified in subsection C of § 2.1-116.22 [see now §

2.2-3202

] of the Code of Virginia), A 7, A 15 or A 16 of § 2.1-116 [see now §

2.2-2905

] of the Code of Virginia, (iii) who is employeed by the State Corporation Commission, (iv) who is employed by the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission, (v) who is employed by the Virginia Retirement System, (vi) who is employed by the State Lottery Department, (vii) who is employed by the Medical College of Virginia Hospitals or the University of Virginia Medical Center, or (viii) who is employed at a state education institution as administrative or professional faculty (but excluding presidents and teaching and research faculty) as defined in the Consolidated Salary Authorization for Faculty Positions in Institutions of Higher Education, 1994-95, and who (a) is a vested member of the Virginia Retirement System and (b) is at least fifty years of age, may, subject to the conditions set forth in the fifth enactment of this act, elect to have the Commonwealth purchase on his behalf years to be credited to either his age or creditable service or a combination of age and creditable service, except that any years of credit purchased on behalf of a member of the Virginia Retirement System or the State Police Officers’ Retirement System who is eligible for unreduced retirement shall be added to his creditable service and not his age. The cost of each year of age or creditable service purchased by the Commonwealth shall be equal to fifteen percent of the employee’s present annual compensation. The number of years of age or creditable service to be purchased by the Commonwealth shall be equal to the quotient obtained by dividing (i) the cash value of the benefits to which the employee would be entitled under the second enactment of this act by (ii) the cost of each year of age or creditable service. The additional terms and conditions specified in § 2.1-116.24 [see now §

2.2-3204

] of the Code of Virginia shall apply to those eligible state employees making such election. Written notification of an eligible employee’s election to participate in this retirement incentive program shall be received by the Virginia Retirement System no later than March 3, 1995. An eligible employee’s retirement pursuant to the program established by this enactment shall be effective May 1, 1995, unless an alternative date is authorized by the governing authority, as defined in the fifth enactment of this act, but in no event later than July 1, 1996.”

Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 5, effective April 6, 1995, provides: “That the following employees shall not be eligible for the incentive programs established by the second and third enactments of this act: (i) members of the Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq. of the Code of Virginia); (ii) members of the State Police Officers’ Retirement System (§

51.1-200

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except as provided in the tenth enactment of this act; (iii) ‘law-enforcement officers’ as defined in § 9-169 [see now §

9.1-101

] of the Code of Virginia and ‘correctional’ and ‘jail officers’ as defined in §

53.1-1

of the Code of Virginia, (iv) presidents and teaching and research faculty as defined in the Consolidated Salary Authorization for Faculty Positions in Institutions of Higher Education, 1994-95, at state educational institutions, except as provided in the ninth enactment of this act; and (v) employees whose positions are contingent upon project grants as defined in the Catalogue of Federal Domestic Assistance. Otherwise eligible employees desiring to participate in the incentive programs established by the second and third enactments of this act shall submit a signed application to their agency head. Submission of such signed application no later than March 31, 1995, shall satisfy the requirement that written notification of an eligible employee’s request to participate in these incentive programs be provided by such date. Such employees shall not be eligible for these incentive programs unless accepted by the appropriate governing authority. The agency shall notify applying employees whether their application has been accepted by April 15, 1995. The criteria for evaluation and acceptance of an application shall be subject to policies and procedures developed by the appropriate governing authority. As used herein, the ‘governing authority’ shall mean (i) for an agency in the executive branch, the Governor or his designee; (ii) for an agency in the judicial branch, the Supreme Court of Virginia; and (iii) for an agency in the legislative branch or an independent agency, the appropriate collegial body.”

Acts 1999, c. 845, relating to sex offender registration and community notification, provides in cl. 2: “That the Virginia Department of State Police shall promulgate such regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2020, c. 759, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Board of Local and Regional Jails, formerly known as the State Board of Corrections, is continued, and wherever ‘State Board of Corrections’ is used in the Code of Virginia, it shall mean the State Board of Local and Regional Jails.”

Acts 2020, c. 759, cl. 4 provides: “That the standards, policies, rules, and regulations adopted by the State Board of Corrections in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect until such time as amended or repealed by the State Board of Local and Regional Jails.”

The 1999 amendment

added the paragraph defining “Community supervision.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 807, effective April 9, 2000, added “or operated under contract pursuant to §

53.1-262

” at the end of the first sentence of the paragraph defining “State correctional facility”.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759, in the introductory language, substituted “a different meaning” for “otherwise or it is otherwise provided”; in the definition for “Board” or “State Board,” substituted “Local and Regional Jails” for “Corrections” and in the definition for “Community supervision,” deleted “of this title” at the end.

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 23, effective March 1, 2021, added the last sentence in the definition of “Local correctional facility.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Escape, § 1; 9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 11; 14B M.J. Prisons and Prisoners, § 3.

§ 53.1-1.01.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this title the Board or the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board or the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 53.1-1.1.
Telephone systems within correctional facilities.

The Department of Corrections shall offer debit or prepaid telephone systems, in addition to any existing collect calling systems, which allow telephone calls to be placed to the telephone number or numbers on an approved call list. Such telephone systems may be established with the lowest available rates.

History.

2005, c. 612.

Effective date.

This section became effective January 1, 2006.

§ 53.1-1.2.
Visitation policies.

The following procedures regarding individuals who are physically present at a state correctional facility for the purpose of visiting a prisoner shall apply:

Upon entry into a state correctional facility, visitors shall be informed of the items that they are not permitted to bring into the facility and the items that they are permitted to bring into the facility.

If an item that is otherwise legal for the visitor to possess is not permitted in the facility, the item may be placed in the possession of facility employees, if the facility is able to store such item, for the duration of the visit and returned to the visitor upon leaving the facility.

If equipment is available, visitors shall be scanned or wanded by an electronic scanning or detection device, or both.

If detector canines are available, visitors shall be subjected to a detector canine search.

If the detector canine search, scanning, or wanding does not indicate any contraband and the visitor is otherwise eligible to visit, the visitor shall be allowed a visit with the prisoner that allows personal contact.

If the detector canine search, scanning, or wanding indicates the possibility of contraband, the visitor shall have the option of consenting to a search of his person. If the visitor does not consent to a search of his person after only a detector canine search indicates the possibility of contraband and the visitor is otherwise eligible to visit, he shall be allowed a visit with the prisoner that does not allow personal contact. If the visitor does not consent to a search of his person after scanning or wanding indicates the possibility of contraband, the Department may deny the visitor entry into the facility in accordance with the operating procedures regarding visiting privileges as authorized by §

53.1-30

.

A visitor shall be allowed to leave the correctional facility and discontinue the search process prior to the discovery of contraband. A visitor shall not be barred from future visits because he stops a search prior to the discovery of contraband or refuses to consent to a search of his person, including refusing to consent to a strip search or a search of any body cavity. Correctional facility personnel shall not use the search procedure or search results as a threat to bar future visits. The superintendent, warden, or other official in charge of the facility shall ensure that correctional facility personnel do not use the search procedure or search results as a threat to bar future visits.

History.

2020, c. 1170.